Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5430.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-42.1. Diagnostic and supplemental breast examination.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirements" means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any
maximum limitation on the application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar
out-of-pocket expense.
(2) "Diagnostic breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast
magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to evaluate an abnormality seen or suspected from a screening examination for
breast cancer; or
(ii) Used to evaluate an abnormality detected by another means of examination.
(3) "Supplemental breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using breast magnetic resonance imaging, or
breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or suspected; and
(ii) Based on personal or family medical history, or additional factors that may increase the
individual’s risk of breast cancer.

(b) In the case that a group health plan, or a health insurance issuer offering group or
individual health insurance coverage, that provides benefits with respect to screening, supplemental
and diagnostic breast examinations furnished to an individual enrolled under such plan or such
coverage, the plan or coverage shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-34.2. Diagnostic and supplemental breast examination.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirements" means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any
maximum limitation on the application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar
out-of-pocket expense.
(2) "Diagnostic breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast
magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to evaluate an abnormality seen or suspected from a screening examination for
breast cancer; or
(ii) Used to evaluate an abnormality detected by another means of examination.
(3) "Supplemental breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using breast magnetic resonance imaging, or
breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or suspected; and
(ii) Based on personal or family medical history, or additional factors that may increase the
individual’s risk of breast cancer.
(b) In the case that a group health plan, or a health insurance issuer offering group or
individual health insurance coverage, that provides benefits with respect to screening, supplemental
and diagnostic breast examinations furnished to an individual enrolled under such plan or such
coverage, the plan or coverage shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-17.2. Diagnostic and supplemental breast examination.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirements" means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any
maximum limitation on the application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar
out-of-pocket expense.
LC001538 - Page 2 of 5

(2) "Diagnostic breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast
magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to evaluate an abnormality seen or suspected from a screening examination for
breast cancer; or
(ii) Used to evaluate an abnormality detected by another means of examination.
(3) "Supplemental breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using breast magnetic resonance imaging, or
breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or suspected; and
(ii) Based on personal or family medical history, or additional factors that may increase the
individual’s risk of breast cancer.
(b) In the case that a group health plan, or a health insurance issuer offering group or
individual health insurance coverage, that provides benefits with respect to screening, supplemental
and diagnostic breast examinations furnished to an individual enrolled under such plan or such
coverage, the plan or coverage shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-30.2. Diagnostic and supplemental breast examination.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirements" means a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any
maximum limitation on the application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar
out-of-pocket expense.
(2) "Diagnostic breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast
magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to evaluate an abnormality seen or suspected from a screening examination for
breast cancer; or
(ii) Used to evaluate an abnormality detected by another means of examination.
(3) "Supplemental breast examinations" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using breast magnetic resonance imaging, or
breast ultrasound, that is:
(i) Used to screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or suspected; and
(ii) Based on personal or family medical history, or additional factors that may increase the
LC001538 - Page 3 of 5

individual’s risk of breast cancer.
(b) In the case that a group health plan, or a health insurance issuer offering group or
individual health insurance coverage, that provides benefits with respect to screening, supplemental
and diagnostic breast examinations furnished to an individual enrolled under such plan or such
coverage, the plan or coverage shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001538
========
LC001538 - Page 4 of 5